trunk/apertium-en-ca/apertium-en-ca.en.metadix
    <pardef n="beg/et__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otten</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="beg/in__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ins</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="h/old__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>old</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>old</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olds</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eld</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eld</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olding</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olding</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olding</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ben/d__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ds</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cut__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/ide__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ide</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ide</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ides</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ode</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idden</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ake__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ake</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ake</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>akes</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ook</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aken</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aking</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aking</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aking</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="underlet"><i>underlet</i><par n="cut__vblex" /></e>
    <e lm="begin"><i>beg</i><par n="beg/in__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bend"><i>ben</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bet"><i>bet</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="build"><i>buil</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="rebuild"><i>rebuil</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="cut"><i>cut</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="hold"><i>h</i><par n="h/old__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="hit"><i>hit</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="lend"><i>len</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="let"><i>let</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="put"><i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="send back"><i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="send in"><i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="send"><i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="set"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="set up"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="shake"><i>sh</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="shut"><i>shut</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="shut down"><i>shut</i><par n="cut__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="spend"><i>spen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="split"><i>split</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="take off"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take out"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take care"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>care</l><r><g><b/>care</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take part"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>part</l><r><g><b/>part</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take place"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>place</l><r><g><b/>place</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take advantage of"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>advantage<b/>of</l><r><g><b/>advantage<b/>of</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="take away"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>away</l><r><g><b/>away</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="undertake"><i>undert</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="upset"><i>upset</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="ride"><i>r</i><par n="r/ide__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="take for granted"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>for<b/>granted</l><r><g><b/>for<b/>granted</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="hold responsible"><i>h</i><par n="h/old__vblex" sa="sep" />         <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>       <p>        <l><b/>responsible</l><r><g><b/>responsible</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take into account"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex" sa="sep" />         <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>       <p>        <l><b/>into<b/>account</l><r><g><b/>into<b/>account</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take responsibility"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>responsibility</l><r><g><b/>responsibility</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take refuge"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/>       <p>        <l><b/>refuge</l><r><g><b/>refuge</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="set"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="set fire"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex"/><p><l><b/>fire</l><r><g><b/>fire</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="set fire to"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex"/><p><l><b/>fire<b/>to</l><r><g><b/>fire<b/>to</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="cut across" a="eleka"><i>cut</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>across</l><r><g><b/>across</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="put across" a="eleka"><i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>across</l><r><g><b/>across</g></r></p></e>
